hfst/verb-som-morph.txt
! ----------------- !
! Prefix morphology !
! ----------------- !

 ! ------------------------- !
 !  Morphophonological notes !
 ! ------------------------- !
	
	! *** For information on changes that are more to do with stems, 
	! take a look at the corresponding lexicon file. *** 
	
	! Person morphemes
	!	Using funky characters so that it will be incredibly obvious
	!	if something isn't surfacing how it should.
	
			! {đ} - 1Sg, 3SgM and 3Pl; 	realized as 0/y/d in classes
			! {ŧ} - 2Sg, 3SgF, 2Pl; 	realized as t/s in classes 
			! {ñ} - 1Pl;				realized as n in all classes
			!							  'special' here just in case.

	! Diacritics
	! 	Verb classes are marked with @DIACRITICS@, which have no surface 
	!	representation. They should ideally be Diacritics, but for some
	!	reason I can't get anything to compile when they are diacritics. 
	!	Hmm...
	
	! Boundaries
	!	Morpheme boundaries are sometimes recognized, or at least when 
	! 	they are significant to morphophonology.

			! {#} - Morpheme boundary
			! {##} - Ultimate word boundary
	
	! 	Probably not going to use {##} too much, but maybe it will be 
	! 	useful when I start caring about clitics.
	
	! Style tags
	! 	Need to do some research for these. Currently all I have are
	!	ay/ey alternation but not the one that occurs in progressive.
	!	It's likely that this is a dialectical thing, but it may also
	!	be phonological. Either way -ay- is most typically recognized
	!	by the northern dialects, which are considered more 'standard'
	!	for writing, but, some writers are comfortable with -ey-.

			! ay
			! ey - +Sty/TODO




! TODO: Add Ind tag.
! TODO: Subordinate clause forms

LEXICON V1_VerbMorf
+V:{#}@V1@		PostRoot ;
+V+Inf:{#}@V1@@INF@		FINAL ;

LEXICON V2A_VerbMorf
+V:{#}@V2A@		PostRoot ;

LEXICON V2B_VerbMorf
+V:{#}@V2B@		PostRoot ;
! How to work in infinitive with progressive here? +V:{#}@V2B@

LEXICON V3A_VerbMorf
+V:{#}@V3A@		PostRoot ;


LEXICON V3B_VerbMorf
+V:{#}@V3B@		PostRoot ;


LEXICON PostRoot
		Progressive ;
		SimplePerson ;
		ReducedPerson ;
		Imperative ;

LEXICON Imperative
+Imper+Sg:0		FINAL ;

! Pl - -i
! Neg - -in 
! Neg pl - -ina 

! joogs{o}{#}@V3A@ay{#}
	
LEXICON Progressive
+Prog:@PROG@ay{#}		ReducedPerson 		;
+Prog:@PROG@ay{#}		Prog/SimplePerson		;

! TODO: 2Pl keentid
LEXICON SimplePerson
+1Sg:{đ}		PostSimplePerson	;
+2Sg:{ŧ}		PostSimplePerson	;
+3SgM:{đ}		PostSimplePerson	;
+3SgF:{ŧ}		PostSimplePerson	;
+1Pl:{ñ}		PostSimplePerson	;
! These have different suffixes for tense, need different paths; or it gets ugly
+2Pl:{ŧ}		PostSimplePerson/23Pl	;
+3Pl:{đ}		PostSimplePerson/23Pl	;

! TODO: keenaysid / imanaysid
LEXICON Prog/SimplePerson
+1Sg:{đ}		Prog/PostSimplePerson	;
+2Sg:{ŧ}		Prog/PostSimplePerson	;
+3SgM:{đ}		Prog/PostSimplePerson	;
+3SgF:{ŧ}		Prog/PostSimplePerson	;
+1Pl:{ñ}		Prog/PostSimplePerson	;
! These have different suffixes for tense, need different paths; or it gets ugly
+2Pl:{ŧ}		Prog/PostSimplePerson/23Pl	;
+3Pl:{đ}		Prog/PostSimplePerson/23Pl	;

LEXICON PostSimplePerson
+Ind+Pres:aa		FINAL                      ;
+Ind+Past:0			AY                      	;
+Ind+Pres+Neg:o		FINAL						;
+Opt:o			FINAL						;

LEXICON PostSimplePerson/23Pl
+Ind+Pres:aan		FINAL                      ;
+Ind+Past:een			FINAL                      	;
+Ind+Pres+Neg:aan		FINAL						;
+Opt:een			FINAL						;


LEXICON Prog/PostSimplePerson
+Ind+Pres:aa		FINAL                      ;
+Ind+Past:0			AY                      	;
+Ind+Pres+Neg:o		FINAL						;
! No Optative in progressive

LEXICON Prog/PostSimplePerson/23Pl
+Ind+Pres:aan		FINAL                      ;
+Ind+Past:een			FINAL                      	;
+Ind+Pres+Neg:aan		FINAL						;
! No Optative in progressive

! Note there's no 23Pl shenanigans here.
LEXICON ReducedPerson
+1Sg:0		PostReducedPerson	;
+2Sg:0		PostReducedPerson	;
+3SgM:0		PostReducedPerson	;
+2SgF:{ŧ}	PostReducedPerson	;
+1Pl:{ñ}	PostReducedPerson	;
+2Pl:0		PostReducedPerson	;
+3Pl:0		PostReducedPerson	;


LEXICON PostReducedPerson
+Ind+Pres+Red:a		FINAL		; 		! á
+Ind+Past+Red:ay	FINAL		; 		! aý
